Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 3
MOTOR CARRIERS OF PASSENGERS - LIMITED REGULATION

40-10.1-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Charter basis" means on the basis of a contract for transportation whereby a person agrees to provide exclusive use of a motor vehicle to a single chartering party for a specific period of time during which the chartering party has the exclusive right to direct the operation of the vehicle, including selection of the origin, destination, route, and intermediate stops.

"Charter bus" means a motor vehicle with a minimum seating capacity of thirty-three, including the driver, that is hired to transport a person or group of persons traveling from one location to another for a common purpose. A charter bus does not provide regular route service from one location to another.

"Chartering party" means a person or group of persons who share a personal or professional relationship whereby all such persons are members of the same affiliated group, including a family, business, religious group, social organization, or professional organization. "Chartering party" does not include groups of unrelated persons brought together by a carrier, transportation broker, or other third party.

"Children's activity bus" means a motor vehicle that transports groups of eight or more children, eighteen years of age or younger, and any adults over eighteen years of age accompanying or participating with the group, to or from activities that are sponsored by nonprofit organizations entitled to a tax exemption under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or the transportation of children to and from school, school-related activities, or school-sanctioned activities to the extent that such transportation is not provided by the school or school district or the school or school district's transportation contractors.

"Commercial location" means a place where goods or services are bought, sold, or exchanged.

"Fire crew transport" means a motor vehicle that transports people engaged in fighting wildfires.

"Luxury limousine" means a chauffeur-driven, luxury motor vehicle as defined by the commission by rule.

"Luxury limousine service" means a specialized, luxurious transportation service provided on a prearranged, charter basis. "Luxury limousine service" does not include taxicab service or any service provided between fixed points over regular routes at regular intervals.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

"Off-road scenic charter" means a motor vehicle that transports passengers, on a charter basis, to scenic points within Colorado, originating and terminating at the same location and using a route that is wholly or partly off of paved roads. "Off-road scenic charter" does not include the transport of passengers to commercial locations.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 409, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2016:

(9) amended and (10), (11), and (12) added, (HB 16-1097), ch. 186, p. 655, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 2021:

(9) to (11) repealed, (HB 21-1206), ch. 381, p. 2553, § 4, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

40-10.1-302. Permit requirements.

A person shall not operate or offer to operate a charter bus, children's activity bus, fire crew transport, luxury limousine, or off-road scenic charter in intrastate commerce without first having obtained a permit therefor from the commission in accordance with this part 3.

A person may apply for a permit under this part 3 to the commission in such form and with such information as the commission may require. A permit is valid for one year after the date of issuance.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall issue a permit to a motor carrier of passengers under this part 3 upon completion of the application and compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of this article.

Repealed.

A person whose permit has been revoked for cause is not eligible for another permit for two years after the date of revocation. If an entity's permit has been revoked, the two-year ineligibility also applies to the entity's principals, officers, directors, and members of the entity, except for a revocation for failure to carry insurance unless the person knowingly operated a motor carrier without insurance.

In order to obtain a permit under this section, an applicant must have each vehicle operated under the permit inspected within the immediately preceding twenty days by a qualified mechanic in accordance with rules promulgated by the commission. The applicant must also attach a report showing each vehicle passed inspection.

Effective July 1, 2016, any existing permit issued pursuant to this part 3 expires on the anniversary of its issuance.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 410, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(2) amended and (3) and (4) added, (SB 13-189), ch. 365, p. 2127, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(1) and (2) amended and (5) added, (HB 16-1097), ch. 186, p. 656, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended and (2)(b) repealed, (HB 21-1206), ch. 381, p. 2553, § 5, effective June 29.

40-10.1-303. Livery license plates - rules.

The commission shall either:

Create a document that a person authorized to provide luxury limousine service under this article may use to verify to the department of revenue or its authorized agent that the person provides such service; or

Create a system to electronically verify to the department of revenue or its authorized agent that the person is authorized to provide luxury limousine service under this article.

Upon request, the commission shall provide the document to the person with such authority or the electronic verification to the department of revenue or its authorized agent.

The commission may promulgate rules to implement this section and to enforce section 42-3-235, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 411, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-304. Revocation of permit for failure to pay fine.

If a carrier that holds a permit under this part 3 fails to pay a fine or civil penalty imposed under this article 10.1 or a rule issued under this article 10.1 within the time prescribed for payment, and not before the decision imposing the fine or civil penalty becomes a final decision by the commission, the carrier's permit is revoked immediately. Any of the following are disqualified from applying for a permit for thirty-six months after the date the fine or civil penalty is due:

The carrier;

Any owner, principal, officer, member, partner, or director of the carrier; and

Any other entity owned or operated by that owner, principal, officer, member, partner, or director.

This disqualification is in addition to and not in lieu of any other penalty or disqualification, including the period of disqualification specified in section 40-10.1-112 (4).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-189), ch. 365, p. 2127, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (SB 17-180), ch. 281, p. 1532, § 4, effective August 9.